District of Columbia statutes.
42-2704.06

Special or reserve funds; management and investment of funds.

The Agency may establish special or reserve funds in furtherance of its authority under this chapter. Notwithstanding other provisions of District law and subject to agreements with holders of bonds and notes, the Agency shall manage its own funds, and may invest funds not required for disbursement in a manner the Agency determines prudent and in accordance with § 42-2704.13.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 406, 25 DCR 5008
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-50, § 3(a), 30 DCR 5916
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-185, § 3(a), 39 DCR 8221
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 4(a), 41 DCR 2597
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 62, 43 DCR 530
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 9-185, “Public Funds Investment Policy in Financial Institutions and Companies Making Loans to or Doing Business with Northern Ireland Amendment Act of 1992”, see Mayor’s Order 93-76, June 16, 1993.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(a) of the South Africa Sanctions Emergency Repeal Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-127, October 25, 1993, 40 DCR 7583) and § 4(a) of the South Africa Sanctions Congressional Recess Emergency Repeal Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-176, January 25, 1994, 41 DCR 512).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of South Africa Sanctions Repeal Act 1993 (D.C. Law 10-75, March 8, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1518).
1973 Ed., § 45-1921.
1981 Ed., § 45-2136.
This section is referenced in § 42-2704.13.
Limitation on investment of District of Columbia employees retirement funds, see § 1-721.